Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.040

Revocation of dissolution.

(1) A corporation may revoke its dissolution within one hundred twenty days of its effective date.

(2) Revocation of dissolution must be approved in the same manner as the dissolution was approved unless that approval permitted revocation upon approval by the board of directors alone, in which event the board of directors may revoke the dissolution without shareholder approval.

(3) After the revocation of dissolution is approved, the corporation may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the secretary of state for filing articles of revocation of dissolution, together with a copy of its articles of dissolution, that set forth:

(a) The name of the corporation and a statement that such name satisfies the requirements of Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW; if the name is not available, the corporation must deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment changing its name with the articles of revocation of dissolution;

(b) The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

(c) The date that the revocation of dissolution was approved;

(d) If the corporation's board of directors, or incorporators, revoked the dissolution, a statement to that effect;

(e) If the corporation's board of directors revoked a dissolution authorized by the shareholders, a statement that revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors alone pursuant to that authorization; and

(f) If shareholder approval was required to revoke the dissolution, a statement that revocation of the dissolution was duly approved by the shareholders in accordance with subsection (2) of this section and RCW 23B.14.020.

(4) Revocation of dissolution is effective upon the effective date of the articles of revocation of dissolution.

(5) When the revocation of dissolution is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the dissolution and the corporation resumes carrying on its business as if dissolution had never occurred.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2126; 2009 c 189 s 52; 1989 c 165 s 157.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.